Utah statutes.
53A-24-105.   Functions of the office.

The office may:

(1)  apply for, receive, administer, and distribute funds made available through programs of federal or state governments;

(2)  cooperate with federal or state governmental entities to administer programs and program funds;

(3)  contract or cooperate with public or private entities or individuals;

(4)  if designated by the responsible authority, and with the approval of the board, perform any functions or services for the federal or state government that relate to individuals with  disabilities;

(5)  establish subordinate administrative units necessary to increase efficiency and improve the delivery of services to individuals with disabilities;

(6)  establish and operate community service centers, rehabilitation facilities, and workshops, and make grants to public and nonprofit organizations for those purposes;

(7)  determine eligibility for, and the nature and scope of, services to be provided under the state plan for vocational rehabilitation or other programs administered by the office;

(8)  assist individuals with severe disabilities to establish and operate vending machine services and other small businesses, and perform services authorized under Title 55, Chapter 5, Blind Persons Operating Vending Stands, and Chapter 5a, Blind Product Sales;

(9)  furnish materials, tools, equipment, initial stocks and supplies, and occupational licenses needed by rehabilitation facilities, workshops, and small businesses established under this chapter, and develop and execute marketing plans for materials produced by those operations;

(10)  place money received by the office or a subordinate unit through sale of products or services as authorized under this chapter into a fund managed by the office and used to support additional training, production, and sales activities;

(11)  conduct studies and investigations, give demonstrations and make reports, and provide training and instruction related to the work of the office;

(12)  establish and maintain research fellowships and traineeships, including necessary stipends and allowances for those receiving training and instruction;

(13)  institute and supervise programs to encourage the conservation of sight and hearing and assist in overcoming and preventing disabling conditions;

(14)  provide diagnostic, placement, vocational rehabilitation, training, adjustment, and independent living services; and

(15)  do all other things necessary to carry out assignments made by law or the board in assisting and rehabilitating persons with disabilities.

